Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1044. HUNT MEMORIAL HOSPITAL DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1044.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the Hunt Memorial Hospital District.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.002. AUTHORITY FOR OPERATION. The district operates in accordance with Section 9, Article IX, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.003. POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. The district is a political subdivision of this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The boundaries of the district are coextensive with the boundaries of Hunt County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.005. CORRECTION OF INVALID PROCEDURES. If a court holds that any procedure under this chapter violates the constitution of this state or of the United States, the district by resolution may provide an alternative procedure that conforms with the constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.006. PUBLIC PURPOSE; TAX EXEMPTION. All property owned by the district:

(1) shall be held for public purposes; and

(2) is exempt from taxation of every character.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1044.051. BOARD ELECTION; TERM. (a) The board consists of nine directors elected as follows:

(1) two directors elected from each county commissioners precinct; and

(2) one director elected from the district at large.

(b) The two candidates from each county commissioners precinct receiving the highest number of votes from that precinct are elected as directors from that precinct. The candidate from the district at large receiving the highest number of votes from the district at large is elected as the director from the district at large.

(c) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

(d) The board shall provide for clerks as in county elections.

(e) The board shall enter an order declaring the results of the election.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.052. NOTICE OF ELECTION. Notice of an election of directors shall be published in accordance with Section 4.003, Election Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.053. BALLOT APPLICATION. A person who wants to have the person's name printed on the ballot as a candidate for director must file with the board secretary an application in accordance with Chapter 144, Election Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR CANDIDACY. (a) A person may not be a candidate for director from the district at large unless the person is a qualified voter of the district.

(b) A person may not be a candidate for director for a county commissioners precinct unless the person is a qualified voter of that precinct.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.055. BOND; RECORD OF BOND AND OATH OR AFFIRMATION OF OFFICE. (a) Each director shall execute a good and sufficient bond for $1,000 that is:

(1) payable to the district; and

(2) conditioned on the faithful performance of the director's duties.

(b) Each director's bond and constitutional oath or affirmation of office shall be deposited with the district's depository bank for safekeeping.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.056. BOARD VACANCY. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the majority of the remaining directors shall appoint a director for the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.057. OFFICERS. The board shall elect:

(1) a president and a secretary from among its members; and

(2) any other officers the board requires.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.058. COMPENSATION; EXPENSES. A director serves without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on approval of the expenses by the board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.059. VOTING REQUIREMENT. A concurrence of a majority of the directors present is sufficient in any matter relating to district business.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.060. EMPLOYEES. The board may employ a general manager, attorneys, bookkeepers, architects, or any other employees or consultants considered necessary for the efficient financing, development, and operation of the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.0605. EMPLOYMENT OF PHYSICIANS. (a) The board may appoint, contract for, or employ physicians as the board considers necessary to provide medical services at a health care facility owned or operated by the district as provided by this section. The board may retain all or part of the professional income generated by a physician employed by the district for those medical services if the board satisfies the requirements of this section.

(b) This section may not be construed as authorizing the board to supervise or control the practice of medicine, as prohibited by Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

(c) The board shall:

(1) appoint a chief medical officer for the district who has been recommended by the medical staff of the district; and

(2) adopt, maintain, and enforce policies to ensure that a physician employed by the district exercises the physician's independent medical judgment in providing care to patients at health care facilities owned or operated by the district.

(d) The policies adopted under this section must include:

(1) policies relating to:

(A) credentialing and privileges;

(B) quality assurance;

(C) utilization review;

(D) peer review and due process; and

(E) medical decision-making; and

(2) the implementation of a complaint mechanism to process and resolve complaints regarding interference or attempted interference with a physician's independent medical judgment.

(e) The policies adopted under this section must be approved by the medical staff of the district. The chief medical officer and the board shall jointly develop and implement a conflict management policy to resolve any conflict between a policy approved by the medical staff under this section and any other district policy.

(f) For all matters relating to the practice of medicine, each physician employed by the district shall ultimately report to the chief medical officer of the district.

(g) The chief medical officer shall notify the Texas Medical Board that the district is employing physicians under this section and that the chief medical officer is the district's designated contact with the Texas Medical Board. The chief medical officer shall immediately report to the Texas Medical Board any action or event that the chief medical officer reasonably and in good faith believes constitutes a compromise of the independent medical judgment of a physician in caring for a patient.

(h) The board shall give equal consideration regarding the issuance of medical staff membership and privileges to physicians employed by the district and physicians not employed by the district.

(i) A physician employed by the district shall retain independent medical judgment in providing care to patients at a health care facility owned or operated by the district and may not be disciplined for reasonably advocating for patient care.

(j) If the district provides professional liability coverage for physicians employed by the district, a physician employed by the district may participate in the selection of the professional liability coverage, has the right to an independent defense at the physician's own cost, and retains the right to consent to the settlement of any action or proceeding brought against the physician.

(k) If a physician employed by the district enters into an employment agreement that includes a covenant not to compete, the agreement is subject to Section 15.50, Business & Commerce Code, and any other applicable law.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (S.B. 1236), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1044.061. MAINTENANCE OF RECORDS; PUBLIC INSPECTION. Except as provided by Section 1044.055, all district records, including books, accounts, notices, minutes, and all other matters of the district and the operation of its facilities, shall be:

(1) maintained at the district office; and

(2) open to public inspection at the district office at all reasonable hours.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.062. SEAL. The board may adopt a seal for the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1044.101. DISTRICT RESPONSIBILITY. The district has full responsibility for providing medical and hospital care for the district's needy and indigent residents.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.102. RESTRICTION ON POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TAXATION. Hunt County or a political subdivision with boundaries that overlap the district's boundaries may not impose a tax on property in the district for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.103. MEDICAL FACILITIES; LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that the people of Hunt County be provided with the best and most modern health care available. To achieve that intent, the district may locate a medical or related facility in the city of Commerce, in another area of Hunt County, or in another county if the board finds that providing a facility is feasible and in the best interest of district residents.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.104. RULES. (a) The board may adopt rules governing the operation of the district, including district facilities.

(b) On approval by the board, the rules may be published in booklet form at district expense and made available to any taxpayer on request.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.105. PURCHASING AND ACCOUNTING PROCEDURES. (a) The board may prescribe the method and manner of making purchases and expenditures by and for the district.

(b) The board shall prescribe:

(1) all accounting and control procedures; and

(2) the method of purchasing necessary supplies, materials, and equipment.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.106. EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) The district may exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire a fee simple or other interest in any type of property, real, personal, or mixed, located in district territory, if the interest is necessary or convenient for the district to exercise a right, power, privilege, or function conferred on the district by this chapter.

(b) The district must exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by Chapter 21, Property Code, except the district is not required to deposit in the trial court money or a bond as provided by Section 21.021(a), Property Code.

(c) In a condemnation proceeding brought by the district, the district is not required to:

(1) pay in advance or provide a bond or other security for costs in the trial court;

(2) provide a bond for the issuance of a temporary restraining order or a temporary injunction; or

(3) provide a bond for costs or a supersedeas bond on an appeal or writ of error.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.107. GIFTS AND ENDOWMENTS. The board may accept for the district a gift or endowment to be held in trust and administered by the board for the purposes and under the directions, limitations, or other provisions prescribed in writing by the donor that are not inconsistent with the proper management and objectives of the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.108. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT; PROCEDURES. (a) When a patient who resides in the district is admitted to a district facility, the board shall have an inquiry made into the circumstances of:

(1) the patient; and

(2) the patient's relatives who are legally liable for the patient's support.

(b) If an agent designated by the district to handle the inquiry determines that the patient or those relatives cannot pay all or part of the costs of the care and treatment in the hospital, the amount of the costs that cannot be paid becomes a charge against the district.

(c) If the board determines that the patient or those relatives are liable to pay for all or part of the costs of the patient's care and treatment, the patient or those relatives shall be ordered to pay to the district's treasurer a specified amount each week for the patient's support. The amount ordered must be proportionate to the person's financial ability and may not exceed the actual per capita cost of maintenance.

(d) The district may collect the amount from the patient's estate, or from any relative who is legally liable for the patient's support, in the manner provided by law for the collection of expenses of the last illness of a deceased person.

(e) If there is a dispute as to the ability to pay, or doubt in the mind of the district's designated agent, the board shall hold a hearing and, after calling witnesses, shall:

(1) resolve the dispute or doubt; and

(2) issue an appropriate order.

(f) Either party to the dispute may appeal the order to the district court.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.109. AUTHORITY TO SUE AND BE SUED. As a governmental agency, the district may sue and be sued in its own name in any court of this state.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1044.151. BUDGET. The board annually shall require a budget to be prepared for the next fiscal year that includes:

(1) proposed expenditures and disbursements;

(2) estimated receipts and collections; and

(3) the amount of taxes required to be imposed for the year.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.152. PROPOSED BUDGET: NOTICE AND HEARING. (a) The board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget.

(b) Notice of the hearing must be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in Hunt County not later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) Any district taxpayer is entitled to:

(1) appear at the time and place designated in the notice; and

(2) be heard regarding any item included in the proposed budget.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.153. FISCAL YEAR. The district operates on a fiscal year that begins on October 1 and ends on September 30.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.154. ANNUAL AUDIT. (a) The board annually shall have an independent audit made of the district's books and records for the fiscal year.

(b) Not later than December 31 each year, the audit shall be filed:

(1) with the comptroller; and

(2) at the district office.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.155. DEPOSITORY. (a) The board by resolution shall designate a bank in Hunt County as the district's depository. A designated bank serves for five years until a successor is designated.

(b) All income received by the district shall be deposited with the district depository.

(c) All district money shall be secured in the manner provided for securing county funds.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 1044.201. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. The board may issue and sell general obligation bonds in the name and on the faith and credit of the district for any purpose relating to:

(1) the purchase, construction, acquisition, repair, or renovation of buildings or improvements; and

(2) equipping buildings or improvements for hospital purposes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.202. TAX TO PAY GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (a) The board shall impose an ad valorem tax at a rate sufficient to create an interest and sinking fund to pay the principal of and interest on general obligation bonds issued by the district under Section 1044.201 as the bonds mature.

(b) The tax required by this section together with any other ad valorem tax the district imposes may not in any year exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.203. GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND ELECTION. (a) The district may issue general obligation bonds only if the bonds are authorized by a majority of the district voters voting in an election held for that purpose.

(b) The board may order the election on its own motion.

(c) The order calling the election must specify:

(1) the date of the election;

(2) the location of the polling places;

(3) the presiding election officers;

(4) the purpose of the bond issuance;

(5) the amount of the bonds to be authorized;

(6) the maximum interest rate of the bonds; and

(7) the maximum maturity of the bonds.

(d) Notice of a bond election shall be given by publishing a substantial copy of the order calling the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the district once each week for two consecutive weeks before the date of the election. The first publication must occur at least 14 days before the date of the election.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.204. MATURITY OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. District general obligation bonds must mature not later than 40 years after the date of issuance.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.205. EXECUTION OF GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (a) The board president shall execute the general obligation bonds in the district's name.

(b) The board secretary shall countersign the bonds.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.206. REVENUE BONDS. (a) The board may issue revenue bonds to:

(1) acquire, purchase, construct, repair, renovate, or equip buildings or improvements for hospital purposes; or

(2) acquire sites to be used for hospital purposes.

(b) The bonds must be payable from and secured by a pledge of all or part of the revenues derived from the operation of the district's hospital system, including district facilities.

(c) The bonds may be additionally secured by a mortgage or deed of trust lien on all or part of the district property.

(d) The bonds must be issued in the manner and in accordance with the procedures and requirements prescribed by Sections 264.042, 264.043, 264.046, 264.047, 264.048, and 264.049, Health and Safety Code, for issuance of revenue bonds by county hospital authorities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.207. REFUNDING BONDS. (a) The board may issue refunding bonds to refund outstanding indebtedness issued or assumed by the district.

(b) A refunding bond may be:

(1) sold, with the proceeds of the refunding bond applied to the payment of the outstanding indebtedness; or

(2) exchanged wholly or partly for not less than a similar principal amount of outstanding indebtedness.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.208. ADDITIONAL MEANS OF SECURING REPAYMENT OF BONDS. In addition to the authority to issue general obligation bonds and revenue bonds under this subchapter, the board may provide for the security and payment of district bonds from a pledge of a combination of ad valorem taxes as authorized by Section 1044.202 and revenue and other sources authorized by Section 1044.206.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2015.

Sec. 1044.209. USE OF BOND PROCEEDS. The district may use the proceeds of bonds issued under this subchapter to pay:

(1) any expense the board determines is reasonable and necessary to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds;

(2) interest payments on the bonds during a period of acquisition or construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, not to exceed five years;

(3) costs related to the financing of the bond funds, including debt service reserve and contingency funds;

(4) costs related to the bond issuance;

(5) costs related to the acquisition of land or interests in land for a project or facility to be provided through the bonds; and

(6) costs of construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, including the payment of related professional services and expenses.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 377 (H.B. 797), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER F. TAXES

Sec. 1044.251. IMPOSITION OF AD VALOREM TAX. (a) On final approval of the annual budget, the board shall impose a tax on all property in the district subject to district taxation.

(b) The board shall impose the tax to:

(1) pay the interest on and create a sinking fund for bonds and other obligations issued or assumed by the district for hospital purposes;

(2) provide for the operation and maintenance of the district and hospital system;

(3) make improvements and additions to the hospital system; and

(4) acquire necessary sites for the hospital system by purchase, lease, or condemnation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.252. TAX RATE. The board may impose the tax at a rate not to exceed 75 cents on each $100 valuation of all taxable property in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 1044.253. TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. The board may:

(1) appoint a tax assessor-collector for the district; or

(2) contract with the tax assessor-collector of Hunt County, the City of Greenville, or the Greenville Independent School District for the assessment or collection, or the assessment and collection, of taxes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2009.